Utah statutes.
13-14-305.   Evidence to be considered in determining cause to terminate or
discontinue.
(1)  In determining whether a franchisor has established good cause for
terminating or not continuing a franchise agreement, the advisory board and
the executive director shall consider:
(a)  the amount of business transacted by the franchisee, as compared to
business available to the franchisee;
(b)  the investment necessarily made and obligations incurred by the
franchisee in the performance of the franchisee's part of the franchise
agreement;
(c)  the permanency of the investment;
(d)  whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare or public
interest for the business of the franchisee to be disrupted;
(e)  whether the franchisee has adequate motor vehicle sales and service
facilities, equipment, vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel to
reasonably provide for the needs of the consumer for the new motor vehicles
handled by the franchisee and has been and is rendering adequate services to
the public;
(f)  whether the franchisee refuses to honor warranties of the franchisor
under which the warranty service work is to be performed pursuant to the
franchise agreement, if the franchisor reimburses the franchisee for the
warranty service work;
(g)  failure by the franchisee to substantially comply with those requirements
of the franchise agreement that are determined by the advisory board or the
executive director to be:
(i)  reasonable;
(ii)  material; and
(iii)  not in violation of this chapter;
(h)  evidence of bad faith by the franchisee in complying with those terms of
the franchise agreement that are determined by the advisory board or the
executive director to be:
(i)  reasonable;
(ii)  material; and
(iii)  not in violation of this chapter;
(i)  prior misrepresentation by the franchisee in applying for the franchise;
(j)  transfer of any ownership or interest in the franchise without first
obtaining approval from the franchisor or the executive director after receipt
of the advisory board's recommendation; and
(k)  any other factor the advisory board or the executive director consider
relevant.
(2)  Notwithstanding any franchise agreement, the following do not constitute
good cause, as used in this chapter for the termination or noncontinuation of
a franchise:
(a)  the sole fact that the franchisor desires greater market penetration or
more sales or leases of new motor vehicles;
(b)  the change of ownership of the franchisee's dealership or the change of
executive management of the franchisee's dealership unless the franchisor
proves that the change of ownership or executive management will be
substantially detrimental to the distribution of the franchisor's motor
vehicles; or
(c)  the fact that the franchisee has justifiably refused or declined to
participate in any conduct covered by Section 13-14-201.
(3)  For purposes of Subsection (2), "substantially detrimental" includes the
failure of any proposed transferee to meet the objective criteria applied by
the franchisor in qualifying franchisees at the time of application.
